trunk/incubator/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="abe__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rs</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rnes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hus__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ateist__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alibi__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="åkande"><i>åkande</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apokalypse"><i>apokalypse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ballade"><i>ballade</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berigtigelse"><i>berigtigelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blase"><i>blase</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brandslange"><i>brandslange</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bysvale"><i>bysvale</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="debutrolle"><i>debutrolle</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dørklokke"><i>dørklokke</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elevskole"><i>elevskole</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="falbydelse"><i>falbydelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fjerpose"><i>fjerpose</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foredragsrække"><i>foredragsrække</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fortrædigelse"><i>fortrædigelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrstesuite"><i>fyrstesuite</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grimasse"><i>grimasse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hjemgivelse"><i>hjemgivelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="informationsmængde"><i>informationsmængde</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kappe"><i>kappe</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kolonihave"><i>kolonihave</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lungebetændelse"><i>lungebetændelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odde"><i>odde</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pistacie"><i>pistacie</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rørflange"><i>rørflange</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skaftestøvle"><i>skaftestøvle</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snedrive"><i>snedrive</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stiftsdame"><i>stiftsdame</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taleøvelse"><i>taleøvelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tratte"><i>tratte</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="urhøne"><i>urhøne</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alfabet"><i>alfabet</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="årsregnskab"><i>årsregnskab</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bedrageri"><i>bedrageri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bogstav"><i>bogstav</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="calciumklorid"><i>calciumklorid</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="delresultat"><i>delresultat</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="driftsinventar"><i>driftsinventar</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="erkendelsesniveau"><i>erkendelsesniveau</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiksfakseri"><i>fiksfakseri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forfatterskab"><i>forfatterskab</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gåfelt"><i>gåfelt</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="herred"><i>herred</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="interessekontor"><i>interessekontor</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kendingssignal"><i>kendingssignal</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krakileri"><i>krakileri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="madsted"><i>madsted</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="murerværktøj"><i>murerværktøj</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasfoto"><i>pasfoto</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protein"><i>protein</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ridderskab"><i>ridderskab</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seksualhormon"><i>seksualhormon</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skoleskema"><i>skoleskema</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snorebroderi"><i>snorebroderi</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="standardværk"><i>standardværk</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="subjektsprædikat"><i>subjektsprædikat</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teknokrati"><i>teknokrati</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="traktørsted"><i>traktørsted</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uretan"><i>uretan</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afskedsbegæring"><i>afskedsbegæring</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="angostura"><i>angostura</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avancering"><i>avancering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="besøgelsestid"><i>besøgelsestid</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="børneopsparing"><i>børneopsparing</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centralstation"><i>centralstation</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="delirist"><i>delirist</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dogmatisering"><i>dogmatisering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eksperimentator"><i>eksperimentator</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="faglitteratur"><i>faglitteratur</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flekstid"><i>flekstid</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forsøgsperson"><i>forsøgsperson</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geisha"><i>geisha</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="helgen"><i>helgen</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="indskibning"><i>indskibning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kandidat"><i>kandidat</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konfirmation"><i>konfirmation</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="låntagning"><i>låntagning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mavelanding"><i>mavelanding</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nedtrapning"><i>nedtrapning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opskruning"><i>opskruning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pilotering"><i>pilotering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rafling"><i>rafling</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="resident"><i>resident</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samkøring"><i>samkøring</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="situation"><i>situation</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="standardkontrakt"><i>standardkontrakt</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tiara"><i>tiara</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udligning"><i>udligning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="altriumhus"><i>altriumhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="badehus"><i>badehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beboerhus"><i>beboerhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blokhus"><i>blokhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="borgerhus"><i>borgerhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drivhus"><i>drivhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="enfamiliehus"><i>enfamiliehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="færdighus"><i>færdighus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fireetageshus"><i>fireetageshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flerfamiliershus"><i>flerfamiliershus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forsamlingshus"><i>forsamlingshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gæstehus"><i>gæstehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gavlhus"><i>gavlhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="helårshus"><i>helårshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="horehus"><i>horehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kædehus"><i>kædehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kølehus"><i>kølehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kræmmerhus"><i>kræmmerhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lavenergihus"><i>lavenergihus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="medbyggerhus"><i>medbyggerhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nulenergihus"><i>nulenergihus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="patricierhus"><i>patricierhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="posthus"><i>posthus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="råhus"><i>råhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sneglehus"><i>sneglehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sporehus"><i>sporehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="styrehus"><i>styrehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="toetagershus"><i>toetagershus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="våbenvåningshus"><i>våbenvåningshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
